Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.200

Retaxation of costs.

Any party aggrieved by the taxation of costs by the clerk of the court may, upon application, have the same retaxed by the court in which the action or proceeding is had.

[Code 1881 s 526; 1877 p 111 s 530; 1854 p 204 s 388; RRS s 494.]